pt-PT: Certificação da bola: FIFA Basic; FIFA Quality; FIFA Quality Pro; Aprovado para futsal; IMS; Aprovado pela NCAA; Aprovado pela NFHS; Não certificado; Outro
da: Boldcertificering: FIFA Basic; FIFA Quality; FIFA Quality Pro; Futsal-godkendt; IMS; NCAA-godkendt; NFHS-godkendt; Ikke-certificeret; Andet
nb: Ballsertifisering: FIFA Basic; FIFA Quality; FIFA Quality Pro; Futsal-godkjent; IMS; NCAA-godkjent; NFHS-godkjent; Ikke sertifisert; Annet
ja: ボール認証: FIFA Basic; FIFA Quality; FIFA Quality Pro; フットサル認定; IMS; NCAA認定; NFHS認定; 認証なし; その他
de: Ballzertifizierung: FIFA Basic; FIFA Quality; FIFA Quality Pro; Für Futsal zugelassen; IMS; Von der NCAA zugelassen; Von der NFHS zugelassen; Nicht zertifiziert; Sonstige
ko: 공 인증: FIFA 베이직; FIFA 퀄리티; FIFA 퀄리티 프로; 풋살 공인; IMS; NCAA 공인; NFHS 공인; 미공인; 기타
lt-LT: Kamuolio sertifikavimas: FIFA Basic; FIFA Quality; FIFA Quality Pro; Patvirtinta futsalui; IMS; Patvirtinta NCAA; Patvirtinta NFHS; Nesertifikuota; Kita
nl: Balcertificering: FIFA Basic; FIFA Quality; FIFA Quality Pro; Futsal-goedgekeurd; IMS; NCAA-goedgekeurd; NFHS-goedgekeurd; Niet gecertificeerd; Overig
sk-SK: Certifikácia lopty: FIFA Basic; FIFA Quality; FIFA Quality Pro; Schválené pre futsal; IMS; Schválené NCAA; Schválené NFHS; Necertifikované; Iné
it: Certificazione del pallone: FIFA Basic; FIFA Quality; FIFA Quality Pro; Approvato per futsal; IMS; Approvato NCAA; Approvato NFHS; Non certificato; Altro
cs: Certifikace míče: FIFA Basic; FIFA Quality; FIFA Quality Pro; Schváleno pro futsal; IMS; Schváleno NCAA; Schváleno NFHS; Bez certifikace; Jiné
zh-TW: 球類認證: FIFA Basic; FIFA Quality; FIFA Quality Pro; 獲五人制足球核准; IMS; 獲 NCAA 核准; 獲 NFHS 核准; 未獲認證; 其他
fi: Pallon sertifiointi: FIFA Basic; FIFA Quality; FIFA Quality Pro; Futsal-hyväksytty; IMS; NCAA-hyväksytty; NFHS-hyväksytty; Ei sertifioitu; Muu
sv: Bollcertifiering: FIFA Basic; FIFA Quality; FIFA Quality Pro; Futsal-godkänd; IMS; NCAA-godkänd; NFHS-godkänd; Ej certifierad; Övrigt
es: Certificación de la pelota: Básico de la FIFA; Calidad FIFA; Calidad Pro de la FIFA; Aprobado para fútbol sala; IMS; Aprobado por la NCAA; Aprobado por la NFHS; Sin certificación; Otro
hu: Labdaminősítés: FIFA Basic; FIFA Quality; FIFA Quality Pro; Futsal jóváhagyott; IMS; NCAA által jóváhagyott; NFHS által jóváhagyott; Nem minősített; Egyéb
ro-RO: Certificarea mingii: FIFA Basic; FIFA Quality; FIFA Quality Pro; Aprobat pentru futsal; IMS; Aprobat NCAA; Aprobat NFHS; Necertificat; Altele
en: Ball certification: FIFA Basic; FIFA Quality; FIFA Quality Pro; Futsal approved; IMS; NCAA approved; NFHS approved; Not certified; Other
vi: Chứng nhận bóng: FIFA Basic; FIFA Quality; FIFA Quality Pro; Đạt chuẩn Futsal; IMS; Đạt chuẩn NCAA; Đạt chuẩn NFHS; Không được chứng nhận; Khác
th: การรับรองลูกบอล: FIFA Basic; FIFA Quality; FIFA Quality Pro; ได้รับการรับรองสำหรับฟุตซอล; IMS; ได้รับการรับรองจาก NCAA; ได้รับการรับรองจาก NFHS; ไม่ได้รับการรับรอง; อื่นๆ
ru: Сертификация мяча: FIFA Basic; FIFA Quality; FIFA Quality Pro; Одобрено для футзала; IMS; Одобрено NCAA; Одобрено NFHS; Без сертификации; Другое
zh-CN: 足球认证: FIFA Basic; FIFA Quality; FIFA Quality Pro; Futsal 认证; IMS; NCAA 认证; NFHS 认证; 未认证; 其他
pl: Certyfikacja piłki: FIFA Basic; FIFA Quality; FIFA Quality Pro; Zatwierdzona do futsalu; IMS; Zatwierdzona przez NCAA; Zatwierdzona przez NFHS; Bez certyfikatu; Inne
el: Πιστοποίηση μπάλας: FIFA Basic; FIFA Quality; FIFA Quality Pro; Εγκεκριμένη για Futsal; IMS; Εγκεκριμένη από το NCAA; Εγκεκριμένη από το NFHS; Μη πιστοποιημένη; Άλλο
tr: Top sertifikası: FIFA Basic; FIFA Quality; FIFA Quality Pro; Futsal onaylı; IMS; NCAA onaylı; NFHS onaylı; Sertifikasız; Diğer
pt-BR: Certificação da bola: FIFA Basic; FIFA Quality; FIFA Quality Pro; Aprovada para futsal; IMS; Aprovada pela NCAA; Aprovada pela NFHS; Sem certificação; Outro
sl-SI: Certifikat za žogo: FIFA Basic; FIFA Quality; FIFA Quality Pro; Odobreno za futsal; IMS; Odobreno s strani NCAA; Odobreno s strani NFHS; Ni certificirano; Drugo
hr-HR: Certifikacija lopte: FIFA Basic; FIFA Quality; FIFA Quality Pro; Odobreno za futsal; IMS; Odobrila NCAA; Odobrila NFHS; Bez certifikata; Ostalo
fr: Certification du ballon: FIFA Basic; FIFA Quality; FIFA Quality Pro; Approuvé pour le futsal; IMS; Approuvé par la NCAA; Approuvé par la NFHS; Non certifié; Autre
bg-BG: Сертификация на топката: FIFA Basic; FIFA Quality; FIFA Quality Pro; Одобрена за футзал; IMS; Одобрена от NCAA; Одобрена от NFHS; Без сертификат; Друго